Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 47.2 Heavy Duty Diesel Vehicle Emission Inspections

31-47.2-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Exhaust emissions from heavy-duty diesel engines used in trucks and buses traveling within Rhode Island contribute significantly to air pollution within the state;

Heavy-duty diesel engines in a poor state of repair emit higher levels of pollution than engines that are well maintained;

Citizens of Rhode Island frequently raise concerns about emissions from heavy-duty diesel engines;

These emissions diminish the quality of life and health of our citizens;

Technology exists to determine the level of exhaust emissions from heavy-duty vehicles;

Maintenance and repair procedures are available that can readily be employed to correct unacceptable exhaust emissions;

Rhode Island is a party to a memorandum of understanding among states of the northeast United States in which each state agreed to use its best efforts to implement heavy-duty diesel testing programs consistent with the elements of the memorandum of understanding; and

It is in the public interest to establish a program regulating exhaust emissions from heavy-duty diesel trucks and buses traveling within Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1.

31-47.2-2.
Inspection requirement.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall, at the direction of the director of the department of revenue and in coordination with the department of environmental management, establish rules and regulations and develop testing techniques and emission standards for motor vehicles subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Motor vehicles subject to this chapter shall be determined by regulation, and shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all diesel powered trucks and buses of all model years and over eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) gross vehicle weight rating that operate on the highways of Rhode Island.

Standards for opacity of emissions shall be promulgated for all subject vehicles.

In establishing such standards, the administrator shall review standards in effect in other states in the northeast United States and to the extent practicable shall establish standards consistent with standards in other states.

Emissions inspections may be performed at roadside or in conjunction with any safety or weight inspection.

Any motor vehicle which is inspected and found not to comply with the standards for heavy-duty diesel motor vehicle emissions shall be repaired within forty-five (45) consecutive calendar days after the inspection so as to comply with the standards for heavy-duty diesel motor vehicle emissions, or not be operated on the highways of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 31; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 31.

31-47.2-3.
On-road inspection.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2001, motor vehicles subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a roadside emissions inspection conducted by the state police or such other police officer defined in §

31-1-21

upon a specific designation by the state police, and provided such officers are certified by the Commercial Vehicle Safety Alliance as a North American Standard Truck Inspector.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 491, § 1.

31-47.2-4.
Periodic inspection.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2003, all vehicles subject to the provisions of this chapter and registered in Rhode Island shall be inspected for emissions on a periodic basis.

Vehicles subject to the provisions of this chapter which are operated in fleets of ten (10) or more vehicles may be self-inspected or inspected at a heavy-duty authorized inspection and repair (HD-AIRS) facility on an annual basis.

Individual heavy-duty vehicle owners, not in a fleet of ten (10) or more vehicles, shall have their vehicles inspected at a heavy-duty authorized inspection and repair (HD-AIRS) facility on an annual basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1.

31-47.2-5.
Inspection fee.

A fee, established in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department of revenue, is to be charged for each motor vehicle inspected. The amount of the fee collected shall provide for the cost of inspection, the cost of administering the motor vehicle inspection program, and other costs provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 31; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 31.

31-47.2-6.
Penalty for violations.

After July 1, 2001, any person who fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter shall be subject to a civil violation and penalty of:

One hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for a first offense;

Five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525) for a second offense; and

One thousand twenty-five dollars ($1,025) for the third and subsequent offenses.

The penalties may be reduced upon a showing that repairs have been made to bring failing vehicles into compliance with emission standards. There shall be no reduction for a first offense. Any reduction of the penalty for second, third, and subsequent offenses shall be by not more than four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

No person shall knowingly give false information to a HD-AIRS, the administrator or his designee concerning compliance with the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 11.

31-47.2-7.
Contract.

The administrator may contract the services of an independent contractor in order to carry out his or her duties under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 280, § 1.